Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-504.01
Summons and complaint; service.

A copy of the complaint shall be served with the summons, except when service is by publication. The plaintiff shall deliver to the clerk sufficient copies of the complaint at the time it is filed.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 21;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 14.